Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1612.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Terrorist screening database." A list compiled by the 12345678910111213141516171819 Federal Bureau of Investigation and used by various agencies to consolidate and screen information relating to individuals who are known or suspected as being international terrorists and domestic terrorists.Section 2. Section 6105(c) of Title 18 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.* * *(c) Other persons.--In addition to any person who has been convicted of any offense listed under subsection (b), the following persons shall be subject to the prohibition of subsection (a):* * *(11) A person whose name is included on the terrorist screening database.* * *Section 3. Sections 6111(b)(3) and (6) and (g)(3) and 6111.1(b)(1) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer or licensed collector, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:* * *(3) Requested by means of a telephone call that the Pennsylvania State Police conduct a criminal history, 20250HB1612PN1929 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 juvenile delinquency history, terrorist screening database and a mental health record check. The purchaser and the licensed dealer shall provide such information as is necessary to accurately identify the purchaser. The requester shall be charged a fee equivalent to the cost of providing the service but not to exceed $2 per buyer or transferee.* * *(6) Unless it has been discovered pursuant to a criminal history, juvenile delinquency, terrorist screening database and mental health records background check that the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to section 6105, no information received via telephone following the implementation of the instantaneous background check system from a purchaser or transferee who has received a unique approval number shall be retained by the Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(g) Penalties.--* * *(3) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly and intentionally requests a criminal history, juvenile delinquency, terrorist screening database or mental health record check or other confidential information from the Pennsylvania State Police under this chapter for any purpose other than compliance with this chapter or knowingly and intentionally disseminates any criminal history, juvenile delinquency or mental health record or other confidential information to any person other than the subject of the information commits a felony of the third degree.20250HB1612PN1929 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *§ 6111.1. Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(b) Duty of Pennsylvania State Police.--(1) Upon receipt of a request for a criminal history, juvenile delinquency history, terrorist screening database and mental health record check of the potential purchaser or transferee, the Pennsylvania State Police shall immediately during the licensee's call or by return call [forthwith]:(i) review the Pennsylvania State Police criminal history and fingerprint records to determine if the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm under Federal or State law[;] and determine whether the name of the potential purchaser or transferee is included on the terrorist screening database;(ii) review the juvenile delinquency and mental health records of the Pennsylvania State Police to determine whether the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm under Federal or State law; and(iii) inform the licensee making the inquiry either:(A) that the potential purchase or transfer is prohibited; or(B) provide the licensee with a unique approval number.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1612PN1929 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728